Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4084.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 7001 of Title 59, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Oklahoma Worker
Heat Safety and Protection Act".
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 7002 of Title 59, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
For purposes of this act:

Req. No. 15410 Page 1

1. "Acclimatization" means the gradual adaptation of an
individual to heat stress;
2. "Employee", "Employer" and "Employment" have the meanings
provided in the Oklahoma Employment Security Act, Sections 1-201
through 1-231 of Title 40 of the Oklahoma Statute;
3. "Extreme heat" means a heat index at or above eighty (80°)
degrees Fahrenheit measured at the worksite;
4. "Heat index" means a combined measure of air temperature and
humidity at the worksite;
5. "Heat stress" means the net heat load to which an employee
is exposed, including environmental factors, radiant heat sources,
and physical exertion;
6. "Heat-related illness" includes, but is not limited to, heat
stroke, heat exhaustion, heat cramps, heat syncope, and dehydration;
7. "Rest break" means a paid break from work duties during paid
work hours, separate from a meal period; and
8. "Shaded area" means a space that provides relief from direct
sunlight and adequate airflow for employees during breaks or when
experiencing symptoms of heat stress.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 7003 of Title 59, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
This act applies to all employers whose employees perform work
activities during periods when the heat index at the worksite
Req. No. 15410 Page 2

reac hes or exceeds eighty (80°) degrees Fahrenheit, regardless of
industry or worksite location. Emergency response activities during
disaster or essential service restoration are exempt.
SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 7004 of Title 59, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Employers must provide heat safety training in a language
and manner employees understand.
B. Training must cover:
1. Recognizing signs and symptoms of heat-related illness;
2. Importance of hydration and rest;
3. Heat acclimatization;
4. Employer emergency response procedures; and
5. Worker and supervisor responsibilities.
C. Training must be provided to new employees before heat
exposure and annually thereafter.
SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 7005 of Title 59, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Employers must prominently post workplace notices describing
heat safety requirements and employee rights in languages understood
by the workforce.


Req. No. 15410 Page 3

SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 7006 of Title 59, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Employers shall provide paid rest breaks based on the heat
index:
1. Heat index of eighty to ninety degrees (80°–90°)Fahrenheit -
at least fifteen (15) minutes every four (4) hours worked;
2. Heat index ninety-one to one hundred two degrees (91°–102°)
Fahrenheit - at least 15 minutes every two (2) hours worked;
3. Heat index greater than or equal to one hundred three
degrees (103°) Fahrenheit - at least twenty (20) minutes every hour
worked.
B. Rest breaks must be separate from meal periods.
SECTION 7. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 7007 of Title 59, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Employers must provide access to shaded areas that are:
1. Close to work areas;
2. Ventilated or cooled; and
3. Large enough for employees to rest comfortably.
If shade cannot be provided safely, employers must offer
alternative cooling methods, such as cooling vests and misting fans.


Req. No. 15410 Page 4

SECTION 8. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 7008 of Title 59, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Employers must provide employees with a sufficient supply of
cool, potable water at no cost:
1. Located near work areas;
2. At least thirty-two (32) ounces per hour of work; and
3. Maintained at or below seventy-seven degrees (77°)
Fahrenheit.
SECTION 9. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 7009 of Title 59, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Employers must establish a plan to gradually increase
exposure to extreme heat for:
1. New employees; and
2. Employees returning after absence or who have worked extreme
heat previously.
B. Plans must ensure employees are supervised and their
exposure increases gradually over a set acclimatization period.
SECTION 10. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 7010 of Title 59, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Employers must have and implement written emergency response
procedures for heat-related illness, including:
Req. No. 15410 Page 5

1. Monitoring the heat index;
2. Designating responsible individuals to call emergency
services;
3. Pairing employees as safety partners; and
4. Prompt documentation and response to symptoms.
SECTION 11. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 7011 of Title 59, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Employers may not retaliate or discriminate against employees
for:
1. Taking required breaks or accessing water/shade;
2. Reporting heat-related symptoms;
3. Filing complaints or participating in enforcement; or
4. Refusing unsafe work due to heat hazards.
SECTION 12. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 7012 of Title 59, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Employees may file a complaint with the Oklahoma Department
of Labor.
B. The Department shall investigate reported violations and may
impose administrative penalties for noncompliance.
C. Remedies for retaliation include reinstatement, back pay,
and benefits restoration.

Req. No. 15410 Page 6

SECTION 13. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 7013 of Title 59, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The Oklahoma Department of Labor shall publish online guidance
for employers and employees on heat safety, training requirements,
and best practices.
SECTION 14. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-15410 TKR 01/08/26















Req. No. 15410 Page 7